Idaho, session 2025, S1175.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Correction the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. MANAGEMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,754,900 $1,754,900
Inmate Labor
Fund 684,400 $850,000 1,534,400
TOTAL $2,439,300 $850,000 $3,289,300
II. STATE PRISONS:
A. PRISONS ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $907,400 $2,976,500 $3,883,900
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 0 29,700 $293,100 322,800
TOTAL $907,400 $3,006,200 $293,100 $4,206,700
B. IDAHO STATE CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - BOISE:
FROM:
General
Fund $225,200 $225,200


FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
Inmate Labor
Fund 70,600 70,600
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 56,200 $2,117,900 2,174,100
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 45,800 0 45,800
TOTAL $397,800 $2,117,900 $2,515,700
C. IDAHO STATE CORRECTIONAL CENTER - BOISE:
FROM:
General
Fund $294,000 $294,000
Inmate Labor
Fund 8,500 8,500
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 377,300 $50,500 427,800
TOTAL $679,800 $50,500 $730,300
D. IDAHO CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - OROFINO:
FROM:
General
Fund $75,300 $75,300
Inmate Labor
Fund 9,500 $237,600 247,100
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 1,300 0 1,300
TOTAL $86,100 $237,600 $323,700
E. IDAHO MAXIMUM SECURITY INSTITUTION - BOISE:
FROM:
General
Fund $103,600 $103,600
Inmate Labor
Fund 600 600
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 10,500 $634,900 645,400
TOTAL $114,700 $634,900 $749,600


FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
F. NORTH IDAHO CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - COTTONWOOD:
FROM:
General
Fund $61,600 $61,600
Inmate Labor
Fund 3,300 3,300
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 113,100 $338,500 451,600
TOTAL $178,000 $338,500 $516,500
G. SOUTH IDAHO CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - BOISE:
FROM:
General
Fund $114,100 $114,100
Inmate Labor
Fund 12,500 12,500
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 36,200 $791,800 828,000
TOTAL $162,800 $791,800 $954,600
H. ST. ANTHONY WORK CAMP:
FROM:
General
Fund $41,200 $41,200
Inmate Labor
Fund 19,600 19,600
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 20,000 $79,200 99,200
TOTAL $80,800 $79,200 $160,000
I. POCATELLO WOMEN'S CORRECTIONAL CENTER:
FROM:
General
Fund $62,200 $62,200
Inmate Labor
Fund 3,200 3,200


FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 14,800 $21,500 36,300
TOTAL $80,200 $21,500 $101,700
J. SOUTH BOISE WOMEN'S CORRECTIONAL CENTER:
FROM:
General
Fund $40,100 $40,100
Inmate Labor
Fund 300 300
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 56,900 $117,000 173,900
TOTAL $97,300 $117,000 $214,300
K. MOUNTAIN VIEW TRANSFORMATION CENTER:
FROM:
Inmate Labor
Fund $278,300 $278,300
DIVISION TOTAL $907,400 $4,883,700 $4,960,300 $10,751,400
III. COUNTY & OUT-OF-STATE PLACEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $4,527,900 $4,527,900
IV. COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS:
A. COMMUNITY SUPERVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $100,000 $100,000
Inmate Labor
Fund $481,600 481,600
Parolee Supervision
Fund 14,400 0 14,400
TOTAL $114,400 $481,600 $596,000


FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
B. COMMUNITY REENTRY CENTERS:
FROM:
General
Fund $16,200 $16,200
Inmate Labor
Fund $680,700 168,300 $1,005,800 1,854,800
TOTAL $680,700 $184,500 $1,005,800 $1,871,000
DIVISION TOTAL $680,700 $298,900 $1,487,400 $2,467,000
V. MEDICAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,727,900 $2,727,900
GRAND TOTAL $1,588,100 $14,877,700 $7,297,700 $23,763,500
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Correction is hereby increased by twelve (12.00) for the
period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chapter
282, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided for by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Department of Correction the following amounts to
be expended for the designated programs and expense classes from the listed
funds for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025:
FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
I. STATE PRISONS:
A. PRISONS ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $455,000 $1,515,000 $1,970,000
Federal Grant
Fund 0 1,023,900 1,023,900
TOTAL $455,000 $2,538,900 $2,993,900


FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
II. COUNTY & OUT-OF-STATE PLACEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $5,939,400 $5,939,400
III. MEDICAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $5,957,200 $5,957,200
GRAND TOTAL $455,000 $14,435,500 $14,890,500
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 3 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall be in
full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.